Rhode Island statutes. Title 21 Food and Drugs
Chapter 26 Soda and Cream of Tartar

21-26-1.
Appointment of municipal inspectors.

The city and town councils of the several cities and towns may, appoint an inspector of saleratus, bicarbonate of soda, and cream of tartar for the cities and towns.

History of Section.

G.L. 1896, ch. 40, § 7; G.L. 1896, ch. 138, § 1; G.L. 1909, ch. 50, § 7; G.L. 1909, ch. 164, § 1; G.L. 1923, ch. 51, § 7; G.L. 1923, ch. 194, § 1; G.L. 1938, ch. 333, § 7; G.L. 1938, ch, 390, § 1; G.L. 1956, §

21-26-1

; P.L. 2002, ch. 292, § 52.

21-26-2.
Testing and certification — Fee.

Every inspector shall, whenever requested, test any of the articles which shall be presented to him or her for inspection, and shall give his or her certificate to any person applying for it, whether the article is impure or adulterated, and for every certificate the inspector shall be entitled to the sum of two dollars ($2.00).

History of Section.

G.L. 1896, ch. 138, § 2; G.L. 1909, ch. 164, § 2; G.L. 1923, ch. 194, § 2; G.L. 1938, ch. 390, § 2; G.L. 1956, §

21-26-2

.

21-26-3.
Analysis — Fee.

Every inspector shall, whenever requested, make an analysis of an article which may be presented to him or her for that purpose, and shall give his or her certificate to any person who shall apply for it, of the result of the analysis, for which certificate he or she shall be entitled to the sum of ten dollars ($10.00).

History of Section.

G.L. 1896, ch. 138, § 3; G.L. 1909, ch. 164, § 3; G.L. 1923, ch. 194, § 3; G.L. 1938, ch. 390, § 3; G.L. 1956, §

21-26-3

.

21-26-4.
Sale of adulterated articles.

Every person who shall sell saleratus, bicarbonate of soda, or cream of tartar which has been adulterated and thereby rendered an impure article, shall be fined twenty dollars ($20.00), together with the cost of testing and analyzing the impure article; one-half (1/2) of the fine to the use of the city or town where the sale shall be made, and one-half (1/2) of the fine, together with the cost of testing and analyzing the impure article, to the use of the person who shall sue for it.

History of Section.

G.L. 1896, ch. 138, § 4; G.L. 1909, ch. 164, § 4; G.L. 1923, ch. 194, § 4; G.L. 1938, ch. 390, § 4; G.L. 1956, §

21-26-4

.